Illinois, session 104th, SB736.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Section 13-100 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/13-100)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 13-100)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2030)8    Sec. 13-100. This Article shall be known and and may be 9cited as the Universal Telephone Service Protection Law of 101985.11(Source: P.A. 100-20, eff. 7-1-17.)